apertium-eng.eng.dix
<pardef n="pa/y__vblex__sep">
  <e>       <p><l>y</l>         <r>y<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>y</l>         <r>y<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>id</l>        <r>y<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e w="1"> <p><l>ying</l>      <r>y<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
  <e w="3"> <p><l>ying</l>      <r>y<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
  <e w="2"> <p><l>ying</l>      <r>y<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="subs"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>y</l>         <r>y<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ys</l>        <r>y<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>id</l>        <r>y<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="approach__vblex__sep">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ed</l>        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e w="1"> <p><l>ing</l>       <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
  <e w="3"> <p><l>ing</l>       <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
  <e w="2"> <p><l>ing</l>       <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="subs"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>es</l>        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ed</l>        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="h/old__vblex__sep">
  <e>       <p><l>old</l>       <r>old<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>old</l>       <r>old<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>eld</l>       <r>old<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e w="1"> <p><l>olding</l>    <r>old<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
  <e w="3"> <p><l>olding</l>    <r>old<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
  <e w="2"> <p><l>olding</l>    <r>old<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="subs"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>old</l>       <r>old<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>olds</l>      <r>old<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>eld</l>       <r>old<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="ben/d__vblex__sep">
  <e>       <p><l>d</l>         <r>d<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>d</l>         <r>d<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>t</l>         <r>d<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e w="1"> <p><l>ding</l>      <r>d<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
  <e w="3"> <p><l>ding</l>      <r>d<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
  <e w="2"> <p><l>ding</l>      <r>d<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="subs"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>d</l>         <r>d<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ds</l>        <r>d<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>t</l>         <r>d<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="cut__vblex__sep">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e w="1"> <p><l>ting</l>      <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
  <e w="3"> <p><l>ting</l>      <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
  <e w="2"> <p><l>ting</l>      <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="subs"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>s</l>         <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="t/ake__vblex__sep">
  <e>       <p><l>ake</l>       <r>ake<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ake</l>       <r>ake<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>aken</l>      <r>ake<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e w="1"> <p><l>aking</l>     <r>ake<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
  <e w="3"> <p><l>aking</l>     <r>ake<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
  <e w="2"> <p><l>aking</l>     <r>ake<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="subs"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ake</l>       <r>ake<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>akes</l>      <r>ake<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ook</l>       <r>ake<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="bl/ow__vblex__sep">
  <e>       <p><l>ow</l>        <r>ow<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ow</l>        <r>ow<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>own</l>       <r>ow<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e w="1"> <p><l>owing</l>     <r>ow<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
  <e w="3"> <p><l>owing</l>     <r>ow<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
  <e w="2"> <p><l>owing</l>     <r>ow<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="subs"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ow</l>        <r>ow<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ows</l>       <r>ow<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ew</l>        <r>ow<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="br/ing__vblex__sep">
  <e>       <p><l>ing</l>       <r>ing<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ing</l>       <r>ing<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ought</l>     <r>ing<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e w="1"> <p><l>inging</l>    <r>ing<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
  <e w="3"> <p><l>inging</l>    <r>ing<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
  <e w="2"> <p><l>inging</l>    <r>ing<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="subs"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ing</l>       <r>ing<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ings</l>      <r>ing<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ought</l>     <r>ing<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="d/ig__vblex__sep">
  <e>       <p><l>ig</l>        <r>ig<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ig</l>        <r>ig<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ug</l>        <r>ig<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e w="1"> <p><l>igging</l>    <r>ig<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
  <e w="3"> <p><l>igging</l>    <r>ig<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
  <e w="2"> <p><l>igging</l>    <r>ig<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="subs"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ig</l>        <r>ig<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>igs</l>       <r>ig<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ug</l>        <r>ig<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="blow out">        <i>bl</i><par n="bl/ow__vblex__sep"/></e>
<e lm="blow out">        <i>bl</i><par n="bl/ow__vblex__sep"/><p><l><b/>out</l><r><g><b/>out</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="blow out of the water"><i>bl</i><par n="bl/ow__vblex__sep"/><p><l><b/>out<b/>of<b/>the<b/>water</l><r><g><b/>out<b/>of<b/>the<b/>water</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="bring down">      <i>br</i><par n="br/ing__vblex__sep"/></e>
<e lm="bring down">      <i>br</i><par n="br/ing__vblex__sep"/><p><l><b/>down</l><r><g><b/>down</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="bring together">  <i>br</i><par n="br/ing__vblex__sep"/><p><l><b/>together</l><r><g><b/>together</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="dig up">          <i>d</i><par n="d/ig__vblex__sep"/></e>
<e lm="dig up">          <i>d</i><par n="d/ig__vblex__sep"/><p><l><b/>up</l><r><g><b/>up</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="dress up">        <i>dress</i><par n="approach__vblex__sep"/></e>
<e lm="dress up">        <i>dress</i><par n="approach__vblex__sep"/><p><l><b/>up</l><r><g><b/>up</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="hold responsible"><i>h</i><par n="h/old__vblex__sep"/></e>
<e lm="hold responsible"><i>h</i><par n="h/old__vblex__sep"/><p><l><b/>responsible</l><r><g><b/>responsible</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="lay off">         <i>la</i><par n="pa/y__vblex__sep"/></e>
<e lm="lay off">         <i>la</i><par n="pa/y__vblex__sep"/><p><l><b/>off</l><r><g><b/>off</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="let know">        <i>let</i><par n="cut__vblex__sep"/></e>
<e lm="let know">        <i>let</i><par n="cut__vblex__sep"/><p><l><b/>know</l><r><g><b/>know</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="pay out">         <i>pa</i><par n="pa/y__vblex__sep"/></e>
<e lm="pay out">         <i>pa</i><par n="pa/y__vblex__sep"/><p><l><b/>out</l><r><g><b/>out</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="patch up">        <i>patch</i><par n="approach__vblex__sep"/></e>
<e lm="patch up">        <i>patch</i><par n="approach__vblex__sep"/><p><l><b/>up</l><r><g><b/>up</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="piss off">        <i>piss</i><par n="approach__vblex__sep"/></e>
<e lm="piss off">        <i>piss</i><par n="approach__vblex__sep"/><p><l><b/>off</l><r><g><b/>off</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="put across">      <i>put</i><par n="cut__vblex__sep"/></e>
<e lm="put across">      <i>put</i><par n="cut__vblex__sep"/><p><l><b/>across</l><r><g><b/>across</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="put aside">       <i>put</i><par n="cut__vblex__sep"/><p><l><b/>aside</l><r><g><b/>aside</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="put off">         <i>put</i><par n="cut__vblex__sep"/><p><l><b/>off</l><r><g><b/>off</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="send back">       <i>sen</i><par n="ben/d__vblex__sep"/></e>
<e lm="send back">       <i>sen</i><par n="ben/d__vblex__sep"/><p><l><b/>back</l><r><g><b/>back</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="set about">       <i>set</i><par n="cut__vblex__sep"/></e>
<e lm="set about">       <i>set</i><par n="cut__vblex__sep"/><p><l><b/>about</l><r><g><b/>about</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="set up">          <i>set</i><par n="cut__vblex__sep"/><p><l><b/>up</l><r><g><b/>up</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="shake up">        <i>sh</i><par n="t/ake__vblex__sep"/></e>
<e lm="shake up">        <i>sh</i><par n="t/ake__vblex__sep"/><p><l><b/>up</l><r><g><b/>up</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="shut down">       <i>shut</i><par n="cut__vblex__sep"/></e>
<e lm="shut down">       <i>shut</i><par n="cut__vblex__sep"/><p><l><b/>down</l><r><g><b/>down</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="take away">       <i>t</i><par n="t/ake__vblex__sep"/></e>
<e lm="take away">       <i>t</i><par n="t/ake__vblex__sep"/><p><l><b/>away</l><r><g><b/>away</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="take for granted"><i>t</i><par n="t/ake__vblex__sep"/><p><l><b/>for<b/>granted</l><r><g><b/>for<b/>granted</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="take into account"><i>t</i><par n="t/ake__vblex__sep"/><p><l><b/>into<b/>account</l><r><g><b/>into<b/>account</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="take off">        <i>t</i><par n="t/ake__vblex__sep"/><p><l><b/>off</l><r><g><b/>off</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="take out">        <i>t</i><par n="t/ake__vblex__sep"/><p><l><b/>out</l><r><g><b/>out</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="throw off balance"><i>thr</i><par n="bl/ow__vblex__sep"/></e>
<e lm="throw off balance"><i>thr</i><par n="bl/ow__vblex__sep"/><p><l><b/>off<b/>balance</l><r><g><b/>off<b/>balance</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="throw out">       <i>thr</i><par n="bl/ow__vblex__sep"/><p><l><b/>out</l><r><g><b/>out</g></r></p></e>
